Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-137
Repayment; when required.

No county shall require a person to make repayment or any other form of compensation for general assistance provided to such person pursuant to sections 68-131 to 68-148 if such general assistance was not obtained through misrepresentation or fraud, except that a county may require reimbursement for interim general assistance granted pending a determination of an applicant's eligibility for any supplemental security income program or other program of categorical assistance or pending the issuance of a lost or stolen categorical warrant.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 886, § 3.